Tennessee statutes. Title 57 Intoxicating Liquors
Part 1 General Provisions
The entity does not discriminate or limit the use of the facilities solely on the basis of race, creed, sex, or national origin, and has provided to the commission a written certification of its policy;

Such facility has enclosed clubhouse space of at least five thousand square feet (5,000 sq. ft.);

Such facility is located no less than seven (7) miles and no more than eight (8) miles from an interchange of an interstate highway; and

Such facility is located on a geographic area, owned or operated by the entity, which area contains not less than one hundred fifty-five (155) acres nor more than one hundred seventy (170) acres;

A commercially operated recreational facility whether open to the public or limited to members and guests of an association or of the development on which it is located, owned and operated by an association or corporation and in connection with an eighteen-hole golf course, which facility is regularly kept, used and maintained as a place where meals are actually and regularly served, with adequate and sanitary kitchen facilities, and which facility meets all the following characteristics:

The facility must be located in or adjacent to a real estate development containing no less than one thousand one hundred (1,100) acres and no more than two thousand (2,000) acres;

The facility must have no less than nine thousand (9,000) enclosed square feet;

The facility must be located within the limits of a development which is contiguous to a water reservoir operated and maintained by the United States army corps of engineers during 1998 or any subsequent years; and

Maintenance within the recreational area of the following types of recreational facilities:

Golf course of at least eighteen (18) holes;

Swimming pool;

Tennis court; and

Walking trails;

A resort containing all of the following characteristics:

Has a restaurant, with a current overall seating capacity of two hundred eighty (280), including outside dining service, and which serves over seventy-five thousand (75,000) patrons per year;

Is located immediately adjacent to the Cherokee National Forest, the only national forest in Tennessee and the Cherohala Skyway, one of only twenty (20) highways in the country designated as a national scenic byway;

Is located along the scenic Tellico River, a tributary of the Little Tennessee River;

Currently operates nine (9) cabins, a river walk, and an open-air chapel and pavilion;

After a proposed expansion will include at least thirty (30) cottages, a full-service health and wellness spa, a championship golf course, racquet club, adventure club for canoeing, kayaking, hiking, biking and other outdoor activities, an equestrian club, conference facilities, a hunt and fish club, crafts and education, and history tours; and

Is located within a county having a population of not less than thirty-eight thousand nine hundred (38,900) nor greater than thirty-nine thousand (39,000), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

A commercially or privately operated recreational facility containing all of the following characteristics:

The facility is located within a platted housing subdivision of not less than four hundred (400) acres nor greater than five hundred twenty-five (525) acres;

The facility is located on or adjacent to an eighteen-hole golf course located within the development;

The facility is located within a development that operates a recreational swimming pool of at least sixty thousand gallons (60,000 gals.);

The facility operates and maintains tennis courts for use by homeowners, visitors, tourists, or guests;

The facility operates a clubhouse for the use of homeowners, visitors, tourists, or guests of at least five thousand total square feet (5,000 sq. ft.) and the clubhouse houses a restaurant with seating at tables for at least forty (40) people and such restaurant has adequate kitchen facilities;

The facility is located within a county with a population of not less than thirty-nine thousand fifty (39,050) nor more than thirty-nine thousand one hundred fifty (39,150), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census; and

The facility shall have been providing some or all of the described recreational services for a continuous period of at least four (4) years at the time of licensing;

A commercially operated recreational facility, located adjacent to a navigational river which contains all of the following characteristics:

Such facility has direct access to a navigable waterway;

Such facility contains a minimum of two hundred (200) slips for boats;

Such facility provides boat fuel, boat rental and repair;

Such facility is located upon or adjacent to a public park or preserve, which park is at least one hundred (100) acres in size, and which park contains a swimming pool, tennis courts and at least a nine (9) hole golf course; and

Such facility is located within a county with a population of at least three hundred eighty thousand (380,000), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

An entity granted a franchise for the operation of a restaurant or food and beverage services on the premises of the premier type tourist resort, and for such purposes a premier type tourist resort shall have the privilege of granting such franchises;

A commercially operated facility which contains all of the following characteristics:

Such facility was licensed as a health club on December 31, 2015;

Such facility only allows members and their invited guests;

Such facility has two (2) swimming pools with one pool having at least fifteen thousand square feet (15,000 sq. ft.) of water surface;

Such facility provides volleyball courts, a basketball court and a recreation area with food service;

Such facility is located within fifteen (15) miles of an airport;

Such facility does not discriminate against any patron on the basis of age, gender, race, religion or national origin; and

Such facility is located within a county having a population of not less than three hundred eighty-two thousand (382,000) nor more than three hundred eight-two thousand one hundred (382,100), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

A commercially operated facility which contains all of the following characteristics:

Such facility is located no more than three and one-half (3 ½) miles from the right of way of Interstate 40 and fronting on State Highway 92 and has a minimum of eight (8) acres of lake front property with a minimum of five thousand eight hundred feet (5,800') of shore line;

Such facility has at least eighty (80) boat slips and forty-eight (48) dry slips, a boat launching ramp, a full service restaurant seating at least one hundred seventy-five (175) people inside with outside patio dining, a ships store offering boat supplies and gasoline, and an outdoor pavilion;

Such facility provides accommodations consisting of at least twenty (20) lakeside hotel/motel units in a building or buildings designed for such purposes;

Such facility is located within a county having a population of not less than forty-four thousand (44,000) nor more than forty-four thousand nine hundred (44,900), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census; and

Such facility shall also include any commercial boat for charter that departs from any such facility if the boat is licensed by the United States Coast Guard to carry not less than fifty (50) passengers on a single vessel and has adequate facilities and equipment for serving regular meals, on regular schedules, or charter trips, while moving through or docked in any county of the state;

A commercially operated facility which at a minimum contains all of the following characteristics:

Such facility is located within one (1) mile of the right-of-way of Interstate 40 and in an area zoned by the municipality as B-3; and

Such facility is located within a county having a population of not less than forty-four thousand (44,000) nor more than forty-four thousand nine hundred (44,900), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

A commercially operated facility which contains all of the following characteristics:

Such facility is located no more than one-half (½) mile from the right of way of Interstate 75 and accessible to State Highway 68;

Such facility has at least nine thousand square feet (9,000 sq. ft.) of conference space;

Such facility provides accommodations consisting of at least one hundred twenty-five (125) hotel or motel rooms in a building or buildings designed for such purposes;

Such facility provides recreational facilities including an indoor swimming pool;

Such facility does not discriminate against any patron on the basis of age, gender, race, religion or national origin; and

Such facility is located within a county having a population of not less than thirty-eight thousand nine hundred (38,900) nor more than thirty-nine thousand (39,000), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

A nine-hundred-sixty-acre peninsula gated community located on a lake with ten (10) miles of shoreline, and which facility contains all of the following characteristics:

Has an eighteen-hole golf course and tennis courts;

Has a club house, restaurant, lounge, fitness center, and swimming pool;

Maintains a community garden, community and neighborhood docks and a boat ramp;

Has an equestrian facility with extensive riding trails;

Does not discriminate against any patron on the basis of age, gender, race, religion or national origin; and

Is located in two (2) counties one (1) county having a population of not less than thirty-eight thousand nine hundred (38,900) nor more than thirty-nine thousand (39,000) and the other county having a population of not less than thirty-nine thousand fifty (39,050), nor more than thirty-nine thousand one hundred fifty (39,150), both according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

A facility which contains all the following characteristics:

Has resort lodge condominiums, homes and vacation cottages;

Has an eighteen hole golf course and tennis courts with a pro shop;

Has a swimming pool;

Has rock climbing, hiking and biking trails;

Has a full service spa;

Has banquet and dining services and a business service center;

Does not discriminate against any patron on the basis of age, gender, race, religion or national origin; and

Is located in a county having a population of not less than thirty-nine thousand eight hundred (39,800) nor more than thirty nine thousand eight hundred seventy-five (39,875), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

It is lawful for any establishment located in a premier type tourist resort as defined in § 67-6-103(a)(3)(B)(iii) which is licensed to serve beer to also serve wine to be consumed on the premises, subject to the further provisions of this chapter other than § 57-4-103;

It is lawful for any establishment located in a municipality which:

Has an approved Tourist Development Zone as set forth in title 7, chapter 88;

Has a AA minor league baseball team; and

Is located in a county with an amusement park, a ski resort, and a national park,

which is licensed to serve beer to also serve wine to be consumed on the premises, subject to the further provisions of this chapter other than §57-4-103;

A commercially operated recreational facility, located adjacent to a navigable river, that has all of the following characteristics:

Contains at least one hundred (100) boating slips available for lease, rental, or use by guests;

Has one (1) or more restaurant facilities with a combined seating capacity of at least two hundred (200);

Has a lodge with at least fifteen (15) units available for transient lodging; and

Does not discriminate against any patron on the basis of age, gender, race, religion or national origin;

A commercially operated facility that has all of the following characteristics:

Is located no more than six (6) miles from Interstate 40 at exit 427, and on both sides of a county highway known as Harrison Ferry Road. The facility contains a minimum of one hundred forty-three (143) acres, and includes a minimum of twenty-two (22) acres of land zoned commercial for future development at the corner of Back Nine Drive and Mountain View Lane;

Has an eighteen-hole golf course, two (2) practice putting greens, a practice chipping green and a practice area for golf instruction. The facility also contains a large swimming pool, a boat ramp into Douglas Lake, and two (2) tennis courts;

Has a clubhouse with a fully-equipped pro shop, a full-service restaurant seating at least one hundred fifty (150) persons inside, with an outside patio that seats at least seventy (70) persons;

Provides accommodations, consisting of at least twelve (12) hotel/motel units and at least nine (9) villa units; and

Is located within an incorporated municipality having a population of less than five hundred (500), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census, within a county having a population of not less than forty-four thousand two hundred (44,200) nor more than forty-four thousand three hundred (44,300), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census; and

Does not discriminate against any patron on the basis of age, gender, race, religion or national origin;

An inn that has all of the following characteristics:

Contains at least twelve (12) transient guest rooms in the main house;

Has a separate meeting lodge and facility that also houses at least four (4) new French country transient suites;

Has at least two (2) kitchens on the premises and offers at least two (2) meals daily;

Has an open-air, outdoor, sylvan chapel suitable for the accommodation of wedding ceremonies;

Provides entertainment in the form of cooking demonstrations, storytelling and dulcimer playing;

Is listed in Distinguished Inns of North America, 16th Edition, by Select Registry; and

Does not discriminate against any patron on the basis of age, gender, race, religion or national origin;

A commercially operated facility that has all of the following characteristics:

Is a full service colonial mansion located on an eighty-one-acre estate;

Contains no fewer than eight (8) transient rooms and seventeen (17) bathrooms;

Contains a dining room with capacity for fifty (50) persons that serves at least two (2) meals daily;

Has a heated swimming pool, a fitness center, a sauna, a tennis court and a billiard room;

Has a system of hiking and walking trails;

Is listed in Distinguished Inns of North America, 16th Edition, by Select Registry; and

Does not discriminate against any patron on the basis of age, gender, race, religion or national origin;

A facility that has nine (9) acres of shoreline development on Watts Bar Lake and that has all of the following characteristics:

Has one- to three-bedroom cottages;

Has a marina with two hundred fifty (250) slips, both wet and dry;

Has a restaurant and lounge;

Has a swimming pool;

Has rental boats;

Does not discriminate against any patron on the basis of age, gender, race, religion or national origin; and

Is located in a county having a population of not less than twenty-eight thousand three hundred fifty (28,350) nor more than twenty-eight thousand four hundred fifty (28,450), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

A development that has all the following characteristics:

Has a well established marina with boat rentals, gasoline, guide services, etc., and a resort operating for more than fifty (50) years;

Includes more than two hundred (200) acres on Watts Bar Lake;

Has forty (40) cottages rented on a daily or weekly basis;

Has a restaurant;

Has walking and nature trails;

Does not discriminate against any patron on the basis of age, gender, race, religion or national origin; and

Is located in a county having a population of not less than twenty-eight thousand three hundred fifty (28,350) nor more than twenty-eight thousand four hundred fifty (28,450), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

Any facility located in a municipality that has a civil war battlefield:

Of which more than one thousand four hundred (1,400) acres have been designated in the National Register of Historic Places;

For which a management contract has been entered into between the municipality and the Tennessee historical commission;

Which has a self-guided driving tour;

For which long-range plans include walking trails, interpretive signs and a visitor's center with a museum;

At which, every two (2) years, a living history and reenactment of the battle fought in December, 1862 is presented;

That is famous for the southern general's order to his troops to “Charge them both ways”; and

Is located in a county having a population of not less than twenty-five thousand four hundred fifty (25,450) nor more than twenty-five thousand five hundred fifty (25,550), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

A facility that has at least fourteen (14) acres located on a lake of at least eight thousand (8,000) acres and that has the following characteristics:

Contains at least three hundred and fifty (350) boat slips;

Contains a dry storage facility;

Provides boat rentals;

Contains a marine store;

Contains a full service restaurant with seating for at least one hundred fifty (150) people, as well as a private banquet facility;

Has motel rooms and cabins for rent;

Contains a swimming pool;

Does not discriminate against any patron on the basis of age, gender, race, religion or national origin; and

Is located in a county having a population of not less than fifty-six thousand seven hundred (56,700) nor more than fifty-six thousand eight hundred (56,800), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

A facility that has three hundred eighty-five (385) acres of development on J. Percy Priest Lake and that has all the following characteristics:

Has a water park;

Has a marina with more than three hundred twenty (320) slips;

Has a recreational vehicle (RV) campground;

Does not discriminate against any patron on the basis of age, gender, race, religion or national origin; and

Is located in a county having a population of not less than five hundred thousand (500,000), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

A development that has all of the following characteristics:

Has a well established marina with boat slip rentals, gasoline, etc.;

Includes three hundred eighty-five (385) acres on J. Percy Priest Lake;

Has a water park;

Has a recreational vehicle (RV) campground;

Does not discriminate against any patron on the basis of age, gender, race, religion or national origin; and

Is located in a county having a population of not less than five hundred thousand (500,000), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

A fully staffed overnight accommodations facility that:

Is open twenty-four (24) hours a day, located on thirty-four (34) acres of land, that offers at least one (1) meal per day, along with hiking, a fitness facility, an event lawn, and a retail store;

Has twenty (20) one- and two-bedroom cabins that have kitchens or kitchenettes, wood-burning fireplaces, hot tubs, and high-speed internet access;

Has a one thousand five hundred square foot (1,500 sq. ft.) meeting facility with a capacity of up to one hundred twenty-five (125) persons, and a restaurant with a capacity of up to eighty-five (85) persons, both of which have high-speed internet access; and

Does not discriminate against any patron on the basis of age, gender, race, religion, or national origin;

A commercially operated facility containing all of the following characteristics:

The facility has a marina with approximately one hundred sixty-six (166) wet slips and approximately one hundred thirty-three (133) dry storage units;

The facility is located within a lake-resort, gated residential development of at least one thousand two hundred (1,200) acres having in excess of four hundred fifty (450) single family homes and condominium units;

The facility is located on a lake that has over eight hundred thirty-four (834) miles of shore line;

The facility will have a restaurant with a seating capacity of at least fifty (50) people, serving at least two (2) meals a day;

The facility does not discriminate against any patron on the basis of age, gender, race, religion or national origin; and

The facility is located within a county having a population of not less than thirty-nine thousand eight hundred (39,800) nor more than thirty-nine thousand eight hundred seventy-five (39,875), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

A commercially-operated facility containing all of the following characteristics:

The facility has on its premises a marina that has at least two hundred fifty (250) covered or uncovered wet slips and at least seventy-five (75) dry rack slips;

The facility has on its premises property leased or available for lease to a boating, yachting or water-based recreational club;

The facility has on its premises a restaurant, providing food service to the public or for private events, with seating in the restaurant for at least fifty (50) persons at tables, whether or not the seating is inside or on a deck or patio adjacent to the restaurant;

The facility has the capacity to serve as a home berth location for a commercial vessel for hire or for public cruises of at least seventy-five feet (75') in length;

When used in this subdivision (27)(JJ), the “facility” under subdivision (27)(JJ)(i) shall include any location within the property designated by the licensee;

A facility under this subdivision (27)(JJ) shall also include any passenger sternwheel paddleboat, licensed by the United States coast guard, with rated passenger capacity of not less than one hundred (100) passengers and which paddleboat shall be at least seventy-five feet (75') in length, which may use the marina facilities as described in subdivision (27)(JJ)(i) for its home or principal secondary port dock. The authority conferred under this subdivision (27)(JJ)(iii), authorizing the sale or distribution of alcoholic beverages, including beer, on any qualified sternwheel paddleboat shall extend only so long as the paddleboat is located at the marina facility described in subdivision (27)(JJ)(i) or is within one hundred (100) miles of the marina facility;

For purposes of obtaining a license under this subdivision (27)(JJ), the commission shall be authorized to issue a license solely to the owner or operator of a sternwheel paddleboat, meeting the qualifications of subdivision (27)(JJ)(iii), whether or not the facility described in subdivision (27)(JJ)(i) receives a license under this chapter;

A commercially operated restaurant located within a county having a population of not less than thirty-nine thousand seven hundred fifty (39,750) nor more than forty thousand (40,000) and also located within the corporate limits of a municipality having a population of not less than seven thousand seven hundred fifty (7,750) nor more than eight thousand (8,000), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census, and in addition to satisfying the requirements of subdivision (30)(A), also meets the following additional requirements:

The facility is in a structure of not less than six thousand square feet (6,000 sq. ft.);

The facility has seating at tables, for at least two hundred (200) persons; and

The facility serves at least two (2) meals a day, five (5) days a week, with the exception of holidays, vacations and periods of redecorating;

A commercially operated recreational facility containing all of the following characteristics:

Owning and operating one (1) or more golf courses, that include practice putting greens, chipping greens and a driving range;

Operating a clubhouse facility, of at least eight thousand square feet (8,000 sq. ft.), containing a commercial quality kitchen and seating for at least one hundred (100) persons at tables;

Operating a private clubhouse of at least five thousand square feet (5,000 sq. ft.), with seating at tables for at least eighty (80) persons, and which private clubhouse contains a full service kitchen;

Located on a minimum of one hundred thirty-seven (137) acres; and

Located within a county through which a major interstate passes, supports a Tennessee board of regents university of approximately nine thousand three hundred (9,300) students for the 2006 academic year and whose sports teams are nicknamed the golden eagles;

A facility operated either commercially or on a nonprofit basis as a club containing all of the following characteristics:

A clubhouse having not less than approximately five thousand eight hundred square feet (5,800 sq. ft.);

An eighteen-hole golf course for use by its members and their guests;

A restaurant with a suitable kitchen, dining facilities and equipment serving two (2) meals daily and open six (6) days a week;

Is part of a planned unit development;

Has at least one hundred (100) members regularly paying dues;

Does not discriminate against any patron on the basis of age, gender, race, religion or national origin; and

Is located in a county having a population of not less than three hundred seven thousand eight hundred (307,800) nor more than three hundred seven thousand nine hundred (307,900), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

It is lawful for a facility providing full service dining to serve wine to be consumed on the premises, subject to the further provisions of this chapter, other than § 57-4-103, that contains the following characteristics:

The facility provides seating at tables for not less than one hundred twenty-five (125) persons and is located on approximately three (3) acres;

The dining area is at least four thousand eight hundred square feet (4,800 sq. ft.);

The facility provides seating, on a deck or a patio, for at least forty (40) persons, weather permitting, which deck or patio is in close proximity to a river or waterway; and

The facility is located in a county with a population of not less than twenty-three thousand (23,000) nor more than twenty-three thousand two hundred (23,200), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

A commercially operated facility containing all of the following characteristics:

The facility has overnight accommodations for at least thirty-two (32) people in at least twelve (12) private guest rooms with en-suite bathrooms;

The facility has a main dining room which seats at least thirty-two (32) people;

The facility has meeting and conference space, including at least two (2) dedicated conference rooms;

The facility has a historic water-operated grist mill;

The facility does not discriminate against any patron on the basis of age, gender, race, religion or national origin; and

The facility is located within a county having a population of not less than seventeen thousand four hundred (17,400) nor more than seventeen thousand four hundred fifty (17,450), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

A commercially operated facility containing all of the following characteristics:

The facility has a marina with at least four hundred thirty-five (435) wet slips;

The facility has a minimum of four hundred twelve (412) paved single car parking spaces and in addition at least thirty (30) car/trailer paved parking spaces;

The facility has a restaurant with inside seating for at least seventy-eight (78) persons and patio dining for at least fifty-four (54) persons;

The facility is located within one great circle mile of Tennessee highway 56;

The facility is located on a lake with at least eighteen thousand (18,000) acres of water and at least three hundred forty-two (342) miles of shore line; and

The facility is located within a county having a population of not less than seventeen thousand four hundred (17,400) nor more than seventeen thousand four hundred fifty (17,450), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

A commercially operated facility containing all of the following characteristics:

Owning and operating a golf course that is open to the public, that includes practice putting and chipping greens and a driving range;

Operating a clubhouse facility of approximately four thousand square feet (4,000 sq. ft.), containing a commercial quality kitchen and seating for at least eighty-three (83) persons inside at tables;

The facility is located at the intersection of State Highway 55 and Pete Sain Road;

The facility does not discriminate against any patron on the basis of gender, race, religion or national origin; and

The facility is located within a county having a population of not less than forty-eight thousand (48,000) nor more than forty-eight thousand one hundred (48,100), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent census;

The rights of any facility licensed under this subdivision (27)(QQ) as to activities permitted under this chapter may be held by the entity that owns the facility, the entity that leases the facility, or an entity operating a restaurant pursuant to a written contract with the entity that owns or leases the facility;

A commercially operated recreational facility on at least ninety (90) acres of land that borders the Cherokee National Forest that offers lodging, recreation and restaurant packages to patrons containing all of the following characteristics:

A rustic lodge with at least five (5) private overnight rooms that all possess a king-sized bed, mini-refrigerator, coffee maker, microwave, television, sitting area and private full bathroom, all of which have views of the mountains and are situated in a lodge with a shared great room and hot tub;

At least ten (10) cabins for overnight stays that sleep multiple persons, some of which are company-owned and some of which are privately-owned but rented by the company, and include the following amenities: television, outdoor hot tub on private deck, heat and air conditioning, gas grill, cookware, fireplace, linens and towels and large and small appliances including washer/dryer and all common kitchen appliances;

Riding stables with at least twenty-two (22) stalls for both horses owned by the resort and for overnight lease for or by guests, on-site guided trail rides provided by the owners, a horse arena with a bathroom, mountain biking, hiking, fishing including an on-site stocked pond and swimming in the guest swimming pool;

A dining restaurant that possesses a kitchen and is currently permitted to serve beer that is attached to a larger multi-purpose hall that hosts banquets, dining, dancing, music, live bands and other types of entertainment, all of which are connected to two (2) bars and at least one (1) private room and includes dining upstairs and downstairs and multiple outdoor seating decks, all of which possess a combined seating of at least two hundred (200) persons, that serves at least nine (9) meals on a weekly basis, with the exceptions of closures for private groups that include the year-round hosting of reunions, weddings and corporate workshops and seasonal closures, vacations, general maintenance and remodeling by the owners;

A building that contains an administrative office and a general store complete with all sorts of merchandise for use on and off of the premises of the resort, a building that contains a tack store that sells all sorts of horse-related merchandise and a building that contains a game room;

An outdoor pavilion that possesses a grill and in which other outdoor cooking devices may be used and that is used to serve meals outdoors in combination with foods prepared in the kitchen;

A gazebo used for outdoor weddings;

When used in this subdivision (27)(RR), “facility” includes any location within the property designated by the licensee;

Does not discriminate against any patron on the basis of age, gender, race, religion or national origin; and

Is located within a county having a population of not less than thirty-three thousand five hundred twenty-five (33,525) nor more than thirty-three thousand six hundred (33,600), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

A commercially operated recreational facility, whether open to the public or limited to members and guests of a corporation, limited liability company, association or of the development in which it is located, owned and operated by a corporation, limited liability company or association, having all of the following characteristics:

The facility must be located in or adjacent to a residential real estate development containing no less than one thousand (1,000) acres and no more than two thousand (2,000) acres, inclusive of the facility;

The facility must have at least three (3) permanent structures, open to the public or to members and their guests, with the largest structure having at least thirty thousand square feet (30,000 sq. ft.) of enclosed space;

The closest boundary of the real estate development in which the facility is located must be located no more than two thousand feet (2,000') from the right-of-way of Interstate 840 and must be directly adjacent to Arno Road;

The facility must maintain the following types of recreational amenities:

A golf course having at least eighteen (18) holes;

At least one (1) swimming pool;

At least one (1) tennis court; and

A fitness facility;

The facility must have at least one (1) room or rooms that are regularly kept, used and maintained as a place where meals are regularly served, with adequate and sanitary kitchen facilities and seating at tables for at least seventy-five (75) persons;

The facility must be located in a county having a population of not less than one hundred twenty-six thousand six hundred (126,600) nor more than one hundred twenty-six thousand seven hundred (126,700), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census; and

The facility must not discriminate against any patron on the basis of age, gender, race, religion or national origin;

The premises of any facility licensed under this subdivision (27)(SS) means any or all of the property that constitutes the facility, including swimming pools, tennis courts, golf courses, paths and road crossings. A licensee shall designate the premises to be licensed by the commission by filing a drawing of the premises, which may be amended by the licensee filing a new drawing;

A commercially operated recreational facility which contains each of the following characteristics:

Is located within a county with a population of not less than seventeen thousand (17,000) nor greater than eighteen thousand (18,000), according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

Has located on its premises, stables for the temporary or permanent stabling of horses with a capacity of at least two hundred twenty (220) horses;

Consists of property of at least ten thousand (10,000) acres, contiguous and noncontiguous;

Has located upon its premises trails and horseback riding, wagon trails, campsites with electrical service, bathhouses and a pavilion for cookouts; and

Has a restaurant facility for the preparation and serving of food and beverages to guests of the facility located at the facility;

The rights of the facility as to activities permitted under this chapter may be held by the entity which owns the facility, the entity which leases the facility, or an entity operating the restaurant pursuant to a written contract with the entity which owns or leases the facility;

The facility may be a contiguous parcel of property or may be noncontiguous; provided, that any part of the facility which is noncontiguous to any other part of the facility is separated only by a roadway or street; and

The entity excising the rights of the facility shall be authorized to engage in the activities permitted under this chapter anywhere on the premises of the facility as disclosed to the commission;

A privately owned facility possessing each of the following characteristics:

Is located on at least twenty (20) acres;

Has a restaurant facility with at least one thousand two hundred square feet (1,200 sq. ft.) that seats at least one hundred (100) patrons at tables located both inside and outside the facility;

Has a marina with at least one hundred (100) slips and that provides house boat rentals of at least four (4) house boats;

Has at least four (4) cabins, seven (7) camping slots and at least three (3) RV slots;

Has a boat repair shop and a store that carries boating and skiing type items;

Does not discriminate against any patron on the basis of age, gender, race, religion or national origin; and

Is located within any county having a population of not less than seventeen thousand eight hundred (17,800) nor more than seventeen thousand eight hundred seventy-five (17,875), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

A commercially operated facility containing all of the following characteristics:

The facility has a marina with at least two hundred forty (240) wet slips;

The facility has a minimum of nine (9) housing units for rent containing nineteen (19) bedrooms;

The facility has a campground with twelve (12) sites containing electric and sewer hookups;

The facility has a minimum of one hundred forty-seven (147) paved single car parking spaces;

The facility has a restaurant with inside seating for at least twenty-eight (28) persons and patio dining for at least forty (40) persons;

The facility has an outdoor pavilion which seats one hundred fifty (150) persons;

The facility is located on Jefferson Road, approximately six and one tenth (6.1) miles from the intersection with Highway 288/Keltonburg Road and thirteen (13) miles from Highway 70;

The facility is located on a lake with at least eighteen thousand (18,000) acres of water and at least three hundred forty-two (342) miles of shore line; and

The facility is located within a county having a population of not less than seventeen thousand four hundred (17,400) nor more than seventeen thousand four hundred fifty (17,450), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

A commercially operated facility containing all of the following characteristics:

The facility has a minimum of eighty seven (87) parking spaces;

The facility has a restaurant open year-round with inside seating for at least sixty (60) persons and outside seating for at least one hundred nineteen (119) persons;

The facility is located on Highway 96 less than one (1) mile from Center Hill Lake; and

The facility is located within a county having a population of not less than seventeen thousand four hundred (17,400) nor more than seventeen thousand four hundred fifty (17,450), according to the 2000 federal census or any subsequent federal census;

A commercially operated facility containing all of the following characteristics:

The facility has a minimum of eighty five (85) parking spaces;

The facility has a restaurant open year-round at least six (6) days a week with inside seating for at least one hundred (100) persons and outside seating for at least one hundred twenty (120) persons;

The facility is located on Highway 70 less than three (3) miles from Center Hill Lake; and
